Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202685-2613
Eligible disabled person; tuition waiver; conditions; application.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, an eligible disabled person shall be entitled to a tuition waiver as provided in section 85-2620 from any state university, state college, or community college for an associate or baccalaureate degree program if such person:

(a) Satisfies the relevant requirements of section 85-2614;

(b) Meets all admission requirements of the state university, state college, or community college;

(c) Submits the certificate of verification required by subsection (2) of this section; and

(d) Files with the Department of Revenue documentation showing proof of status as an eligible disabled person and proof of residence in Nebraska each year such person applies for and receives the tuition waiver.

(2) An application for the tuition waiver shall include a certificate of verification from the applicant's former superior officer attesting to such applicant's satisfaction of section 85-2614. The applicant shall include the certificate of verification when applying to the state university, state college, or community college in order to obtain tuition waiver upon initial enrollment.

(3) For an eligible disabled person who was a correctional officer or a youth detention officer, the tuition waiver shall only be available beginning July 1, 2027, and shall only be available for attendance at a state university.

Laws 2025, LB608, § 6.